apertium-spa-ast.spa.dix
  <pardef n="/el_tuyo__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>las<b/>tuyas</l> 
        <r>el<b/>tuyo<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>tuya</l> 
        <r>el<b/>tuyo<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>los<b/>tuyos</l> 
        <r>el<b/>tuyo<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>el<b/>tuyo</l> 
        <r>el<b/>tuyo<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lo<b/>tuyo</l> 
        <r>el<b/>tuyo<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  </pardef>
  <pardef n="/el_vuestro__prn">
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>las<b/>vuestras</l> 
        <r>el<b/>vuestro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>vuestra</l> 
        <r>el<b/>vuestro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>los<b/>vuestros</l> 
        <r>el<b/>vuestro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>el<b/>vuestro</l> 
        <r>el<b/>vuestro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>lo<b/>vuestro</l> 
        <r>el<b/>vuestro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="bocazas__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="mí/o__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>as</l> 
        <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>os</l> 
        <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>


  <pardef n="nuestr/o__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>as</l> 
        <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>os</l> 
        <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="mi__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="su__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

</pardefs>

    <e lm="vuestro"><i>vuestr</i><par n="nuestr/o__det"/></e>
    <e lm="nuestro"><i>nuestr</i><par n="nuestr/o__det"/></e>
    <e lm="mi"><i>mi</i><par n="mi__det"/></e>
<e><p><l>mi</l><r>mi</r></p><par n="mi__det"/></e>
    <e lm="suyo"><i>su</i><par n="su__det"/></e>
    <e lm="tuyo"><i>tu</i><par n="su__det"/></e>
    <e lm="mío"><i>mí</i><par n="mí/o__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nuestro"><i>nuestr</i><par n="mí/o__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="suyo"><i>suy</i><par n="mí/o__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tuyo"><i>tuy</i><par n="mí/o__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vuestro"><i>vuestr</i><par n="mí/o__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="el tuyo"><par n="/el_tuyo__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="el vuestro"><par n="/el_vuestro__prn"/></e>
<e><i>bocazas</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>mí</i><par n="mí/o__adj"/></e>
<e><i>nuestr</i><par n="mí/o__adj"/></e>
<e><i>suy</i><par n="mí/o__adj"/></e>
<e><i>tuy</i><par n="mí/o__adj"/></e>
<e><i>vuestr</i><par n="mí/o__adj"/></e>
<e><i>nuestr</i><par n="nuestr/o__det"/></e>
<e><i>vuestr</i><par n="nuestr/o__det"/></e>
<e><i>luz</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>Erasmus</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>extra</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>anticrisis</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>antiespías</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>antimisiles</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>antitabaco</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>calzonazos</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>aguafiestas</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>boberas</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>bocazas</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>cascarrabias</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>cazatesoros</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>cachas</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>calzonazos</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>estéreo</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>gratis</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>guardagujas</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>guardamontes</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>isósceles</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>manazas</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>tragaldabas</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>cazagangas</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>cazatesoros</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>sabelotodo</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>cantamañanas</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>gilipollas</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>manazas</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>meapilas</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>menos</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>mesías</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>metepatas</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>orejotas</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>pelanas</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>tragaperras</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>vivalavirgen</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>vivales</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
<e><i>voceras</i><par n="bocazas__adj"/></e>
